Alabama, session 2026rs, HB574.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution
of Alabama of 2022, is proposed:
PROPOSED AMENDMENT
Notwithstanding Section 155 of the Constitution of
Alabama of 2022, a person who is 75 years of age or younger at
the beginning time of qualifying for election, or at the time
of his or her appointment, may be elected or appointed to the
office of Judge of Probate of Macon County.
Upon ratification of this constitutional amendment, the
Code Commissioner shall number and place this amendment as
appropriate in the constitution omitting this instructional
paragraph and may make the following nonsubstantive revisions:
change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
grammatical, clerical, and typographical errors; revise
internal or external citations and cross-references; harmonize
language; and translate effective dates.
END PROPOSED AMENDMENT
Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
shall be held in accordance with Sections 284, 284.01, and 285
Page 1

shall be held in accordance with Sections 284, 284.01, and 285
HB574 Enrolled
of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws
of this state. The appropriate election official shall assign
a ballot number for the proposed constitutional amendment on
the election ballot and shall set forth the following
description of the substance or subject matter of the proposed
constitutional amendment:
"Relating to Macon County, proposing an amendment to
the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, to set the maximum age at
which a person may qualify to serve as judge of probate of the
county to 75 years of age at the time of qualifying for
election or date of appointment.
Proposed by Act ____."
This description shall be followed by the following
language:
"Yes( ) No( )."
Section 3. The proposed amendment shall become valid as
part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved by
a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
Page 2

a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
HB574 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 17-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 02-Apr-26 Passed



Page 3